Colorado, session 2026A, SB035.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado has experienced a concerning rise in deadly traffic
collisions in recent years, including multiple head-on and other fatal crashes
on rural highways and across the state that have claimed numerous lives;
(b) Official data from the Colorado department of transportation and
Colorado state patrol indicate that speeding remains a leading factor in
traffic fatalities, contributing to hundreds of deaths annually and
representing a substantial proportion of all motor vehicle fatalities in the
state;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(c) Aggressive driving behaviors, such as illegally overtaking a
vehicle on the left in no-passing zones, and repeated excessive speeding
violations significantly increase the risk of serious injury and death on
Colorado roadways and undermine efforts to protect all road users;
(d) There is demonstrated need to clarify existing statutory
definitions of no-passing zones, including that they are indicated by solid
yellow line or line pavement markings, and to strengthen enforcement and
penalties to deter these dangerous behaviors; and
(e) Prioritizing the installation of appropriate warning and regulatory
signage on roadways with elevated incident rates of illegal passing and
other hazardous driving behaviors, as well as ensuring that drivers with
multiple repeated violations face more stringent procedural and penalty
consequences, will enhance public safety and help reduce preventable
traffic crashes and fatalities throughout Colorado.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-127, add (5)(i.5)
as follows:
42-2-127. Authority to suspend license - to deny license - type of
conviction - points.
(5) Point system schedule:
Type of conviction Points
(i.5) IMPROPER PASSING IN A NO-PASSING ZONE . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1005, amend (3);
and add (3.5) as follows:
42-4-1005. Limitations on overtaking on the left.
(3) The department of transportation and local authorities are
authorized to determine those portions of any highway under their
respective jurisdictions where overtaking and passing or driving on the left
side of the roadway would be especially hazardous and may, by appropriate
signs or THE BEGINNING AND END OF SOLID YELLOW LINE PAVEMENT OR LINE
PAVEMENT markings on the roadway, indicate the beginning and end of
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-035

such THE zones. Where such signs or SOLID YELLOW LINE OR LINE
PAVEMENT markings are in place to define a no-passing zone and such THE
signs or markings are clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person, no
A driver shall NOT drive on the left side of the roadway within such THE
no-passing zone or on the left side of any pavement striping designed to
mark such THE no-passing zone throughout its length.
(3.5) WITHIN EXISTING RESOURCES, THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION SHALL PRIORITIZE INSTALLING SIGNAGE ON ROADWAYS
WITH INCREASED CRASHES RESULTING FROM INCIDENTS OF ILLEGAL
OVERTAKING ON THE LEFT IN NO-PASSING ZONES. INCREASED CRASHES
RESULTING FROM INCIDENTS OF ILLEGAL OVERTAKING ON THE LEFT ARE
MEASURED AS AN INCREASE OF CRASHES RESULTING FROM INCIDENTS OF
ILLEGAL OVERTAKING ON THE LEFT IN NO-PASSING ZONES OVER THE
PREVIOUS YEAR'S NUMBER OF CRASHES AS REPORTED BY THE STATEWIDE
CRASH DATA LISTING MAINTAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION, AS REQUIRED BY 23 U.S.C. SEC. 148 AND 23 U.S.C. SEC.
405.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1101, add (13)
and (14) as follows:
42-4-1101. Speed limits - penalties.
(13) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSESS THE FOLLOWING PENALTY FOR
DRIVING TWENTY MILES PER HOUR OR MORE IN EXCESS OF THE REASONABLE
AND PRUDENT SPEED OR DRIVING IN EXCESS OF THE MAXIMUM LAWFUL
SPEED OF SEVENTY-FIVE MILES PER HOUR:
(a) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION IN A TWELVE-MONTH PERIOD: TWO
POINTS IN ADDITION TO THE NUMBER OF POINTS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
42-2-127 (5)(f) FOR THE VIOLATION;
(b) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION IN A
TWENTY-FOUR-MONTH PERIOD: FOUR POINTS IN ADDITION TO THE NUMBER
OF POINTS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 42-2-127 (5)(f) FOR THE VIOLATION; AND
(c) FOR A FIFTH OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION IN A FIVE-YEAR PERIOD:
EIGHT POINTS IN ADDITION TO THE NUMBER OF POINTS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 42-2-127 (5)(f) FOR THE VIOLATION.
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-035

(14) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSESS FOUR POINTS IN ADDITION TO
THE NUMBER OF POINTS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 42-2-127 (5)(f) FOR DRIVING
ONE HUNDRED MILES PER HOUR OR GREATER.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1701, amend
(5)(c)(I) introductory portion, and (5)(c)(I)(D); and add (5)(c)(I)(E) as
follows:
42-4-1701. Traffic offenses and infractions classified - penalties
- penalty and surcharge schedule - repeal.
(5) (c) (I) The penalty and surcharge schedules of subsection (4) of
this section and the penalty assessment notice provisions of paragraphs (a)
and (b) of this subsection (5) shall SUBSECTIONS (5)(a) AND (5)(b) OF THIS
SECTION DO not apply to violations constituting misdemeanors, petty
offenses, or misdemeanor traffic offenses not specified in said subsection
(4) of this section, nor shall DO they apply to the violations constituting
misdemeanors, petty offenses, misdemeanor traffic offenses, or traffic
infractions specified in said subsection (4) of this section when it appears
that:
(D) The defendant has, in the course of the same transaction,
violated one of the provisions of this title specified in the penalty and
surcharge schedules in subsection (4) of this section and has also violated
one or more provisions of this title not so specified, and the peace officer
charges such defendant with two or more violations, any one of which is not
specified in the penalty and surcharge schedules in subsection (4) of this
section; OR
(E) THE DEFENDANT IS SUBJECT TO THE PENALTIES SET FORTH IN
SECTION 42-4-1101 (13) FOR DRIVING TWENTY MILES PER HOUR OR MORE IN
EXCESS OF THE REASONABLE AND PRUDENT SPEED OR DRIVING IN EXCESS OF
THE MAXIMUM LAWFUL SPEED OF SEVENTY-FIVE MILES PER HOUR MORE
THAN ONCE IN A TWELVE-MONTH PERIOD, MORE THAN TWICE IN A
TWENTY-FOUR-MONTH PERIOD, OR MORE THAN FOUR TIMES IN A FIVE-YEAR
PERIOD.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-20-305, amend (2)
as follows:
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-035

42-20-305. Deviation from authorized route - penalty.
(2) Any person who transports hazardous materials by motor vehicle
in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section
commits a misdemeanor traffic offense and shall be assessed a penalty of
two hundred fifty FIVE HUNDRED dollars for each separate violation in
accordance with the procedure set forth in section 42-20-105 (2). A person
who commits a second or subsequent violation within a twelve-month
period of transporting hazardous materials by motor vehicle in a manner
inconsistent with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section commits
a misdemeanor traffic offense and shall be issued a summons and complaint
in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-1707 (1), and, upon
conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred
fifty FIVE HUNDRED dollars nor more than five hundred ONE THOUSAND
dollars.
SECTION 7. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$30,943 is appropriated to the department of revenue. This appropriation is
from the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account in the highway users
tax fund created in section 42-1-211 (2), C.R.S. To implement this act, the
department may use this appropriation as follows:
(a) $22,880 for DRIVES maintenance and support;
(b) $2,009 for use by the division of motor vehicles for personal
services related to driver services;
(c) $2,706 for use by the executive director's office for personal
services related to administration and support; and
(d) $3,348 for payments to OIT.
SECTION 8. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-035

held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to traffic infractions committed on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-035